en: shiitake extract
it: estratto di Shiitake

en: Pleurotus
de: Seitlinge
hr: pleurotus
it: pleurotus
pl: boczniak, boczniaki

en: oyster mushroom
ba: Ҡарама бәшмәге
be: Вешанка звычайная
bg: кладница
bo: ལེབ་ཤྭ།
ca: auriana
cs: hlíva ústřičná
cy: Wystrysen y coed
da: Almindelig Østershat
de: Austern-Seitling, Austernpilz, Austernsaitling
eo: Ostrofungo
es: Champiñon ostra
et: Austerservik
eu: Belarri landu
fa: قارچ چروک
fi: Osterivinokas
fr: pleurotes, pleurote en huitre, Pleurote en huître, Champignons pleurote, Pleurote en forme d'huître
ga: Arc oisreach
gl: Pleuroto
hr: bukovača
hu: Késői laskagomba
id: Jamur tiram
it: orecchione, ostrica funga
ja: ヒラタケ
jv: Jamur tiram
ka: ხეთამხალი
kk: Устрицалық вешенка
ko: 느타리
la: pleurotus ostreatus
lb: Austerechampignon
lt: Gluosninė kreivabudė
lv: austeru sānause
mk: буковка
ms: Cendawan tiram
ne: कन्य च्याउ
nl: oesterzwam, oesterzwammen
pl: Boczniak ostrygowaty
ps: صدفي پوڅکۍ
pt: Shimeji-preto
qu: Rinri q'utu qumutu
ro: Păstrăv de fag
ru: Вёшенка обыкновенная
sh: Bukovačas
sk: hliva ustricová
sr: Буковача
sv: Ostronmussling
tr: Kavak mantarı
uk: Плеврот черепичастий
vi: Nấm sò
zh: 平菇

en: fairy ring mushroom, Scotch bonnet mushroom
bg: обикновена челядинка
ca: cama-sec
cs: špička obecná
cy: Madarch cylch
de: Nelken-Schwindling
et: Aasnööbik
eu: Marasmio jangarri
fa: قارچ حلقه پریان
fi: Nurminahikas
fr: Mousseron, Marasme des Oréades, Faux mousseron, Cariolette
gl: Sendeiriña
hr: vilin klinčac
hu: Mezei szegfűgomba
it: Gambesecche
ja: シバフタケ
ka: ჯიმლა
la: Marasmius Oreades
lt: Lauminis mažūnis
mk: самовилско каранфилче
nl: Weidekringzwam
pl: Twardzioszek przydrożny
ro: Burete de rouă
sv: Nejlikbroskskivling
uk: Опеньок луговий
zh: 硬柄小皮傘

en: wood ear, Jew's ear, black fungus, Auricularia auricula-judea, Auricularia Auricula Judea
ar: أذن يهوذا
bg: юдино ухо
ca: orella de Judes
cs: ucho Jidášovo
cy: Clustiau'r ysgaw
da: Judasøre, Almindelig judasøre, Auricularia auricula-judea, Auricularia Auricula Judea
de: Judasohrenpilze, Auricularia auricula-judea, Auricularia Auricula Judea
eo: Judasorelo
es: Auricularia auricula-judea, Auricularia Auricula Judea
eu: Judasen belarri
fa: قارچ گوش ژله‌ای
fi: Juudaksenkorva, Auricularia auricula-judea, Auricularia Auricula Judea
fr: Oreilles de Judas, Auricularia auricula-judea, Auricularia Auricula Judea
he: אזנונית יהודה
hr: judino uho
hu: Júdásfülegomba
id: Jamur kuping merah
it: orecchie di Giuda, Auricularia auricula-judea, Auricularia Auricula Judea
ja: キクラゲ
jv: Jamur kuping abang
ko: 목이
la: Auricularia auricula-judae
li: Judasoeër
lt: Auricularia auricula-judae
ml: ചെവിക്കൂൺ
nl: judasoor, judasoren, Auricularia auricula-judea, Auricularia Auricula Judea
pl: Uszak bzowy, grzyby mun, uszaki bzowe, grzyby chińskie mun, grzyby uszaki bzowe
qu: Linli
ro: Urechea lui Iuda
ru: Аурикулярия уховидная, Auricularia auricula-judea, Auricularia Auricula Judea
sh: Judino uho
sr: Јудино уво
su: Lémbér beureum
sv: Judasöra, Auricularia auricula-judea, Auricularia Auricula Judea
th: เห็ดหูหนู
uk: Аурикулярія вухоподібна
vi: Nấm mèo
wa: Oraye di Djuda
zh: 黑木耳

en: pepeiao
la: Auricularia cornea

en: truffle
ar: ترافل
ca: tòfona
da: trøffel
de: trüffel
el: τρούφα
es: trufa
et: trühvel
eu: boilur
fr: truffe
ga: strufal
he: כמהין
hi: ट्रफल
hr: tartuf
hu: szarvasgomba
hy: տրյուֆելներ
id: truffle
io: truflo
it: Tartufo
kk: трюфели
ko: 서양송로
li: truffel
nl: truffel
nn: trøffel
pl: trufla, trufle
ru: трюфели
sr: tartuf
sv: tryffel
ta: ராபுள்
tl: trupo
tr: trüf mantarı
uk: трюфелі
vi: truffle
zh: 松露

en: black truffle
bg: черен трюфел
ca: tòfona negra
cy: Cloronen Ffrengig
de: Schwarze Trüffel, Perigord-Trüffel
es: trufa negra
eu: Boilur beltz
fi: mustatryffeli
fr: truffe noire, truffes noires, truffe noire du Périgord, truffe du Périgord
hr: crni tartuf
hu: Francia szarvasgomba
it: Tartufo nero
kk: Жерқұлақ
la: Tuber melanosporium
nl: zwarte truffel
pl: trufla czarnozarodnikowa
ro: Trufă neagră franceză
ru: Трюфель чёрный
sr: Crna gomoljača
sv: Perigordtryffel
tr: Perigord trüfü
zh: 黑松露

en: summer truffle
az: Yay dombalanı
be: Труфля летняя
bg: Летен трюфел
cs: lanýž letní
cy: Cloren foch
de: Sommer-trüffel
es: trufa de verano
et: Suvetrühvel
eu: Udako boilur
fi: kesätryffeli
fr: truffe d’été, Truffe blanche d'été
hr: crni ljetni tartuf, tuber aestivum
hu: Nyári szarvasgomba
it: Tartufo Scorzione
la: Tuber aestivum, tuber aestivum vitt, tuber aestivum vittad
lt: Vasarinis trumas
nl: Zomertruffel
pl: trufla letnia, trufle letnie
ru: Трюфель летний
sv: Sommartryffel
uk: Трюфель літній

en: Tuber magnatum
bg: Бял трюфел
ca: Tòfona blanca
de: Weiße Trüffel
es: Tuber magnatum
eu: Grisola jator
fr: Truffe blanche
hr: bijeli tartuf, bijelitartufi, bijeli tartufi, tuber magnatum
hu: Isztriai szarvasgomba
it: Tuber magnatum
nl: Witte truffel
pl: Trufla biała
ro: Tuber magnatum
ru: Трюфель итальянский
sr: Италијански тартуф
sv: Albatryffel
zh: 白松露菌

en: rhizopus
de: Rhizopus
es: rhizopus
hr: rizopus
it: rhizopus

en: Mortierella alpina oil
fr: Huile de Mortierella alpina

en: rhizopus culture
de: Rhizopuskultur
it: coltura di Rhizopus

en: Penicillium
ar: بنيسيليوم
be: Пеніцыл
bg: Хлебен мухъл
cs: štětičkovec
de: Pinselschimmel (Penicillium)
es: Monda
et: Hallitus
fi: pensselihomeet
fr: pénicillium, penicillium
he: פניציליום
hi: पेनिसिलियम
hr: penicillium, mikrobna kultura penicillium
hy: Վրձնասունկ
it: Penicillina
ja: アオカビ
ka: პენიცილიუმი
kk: Пеницилл
ko: 푸른곰팡이
ku: Xewr
la: Penicillium
lb: Pinselschimmel
lt: Pelėjūnas
nb: penselmuggsopper
nn: penselmuggsoppar
pl: pędzlak
ru: Пеницилл
sl: Čopičaste plesni
zh: 青黴菌

en: pencillium roqueforti
xx: Penicillium roqueforti
de: pencillium roqueforti (Edelschimmel)

en: penicillium glaucum
xx: penicillium glaucum
pl: kultury pleśni gatunku penicilinum glaucum

en: penicillium candidum
xx: penicillium candidum
sv: penicillium candida, penicillium candidum

en: yellow foot
xx: Cantharellus lutescens, Craterellus lutescens, Cantharellus xanthopus, Cantharellus aurora
ca: camagroc
es: camagroc
la: cantharellus lutescens
pl: Pieprznik żyłkowany, pieprznik żółtawy

en: mycoprotein
es: micoproteína
fi: mycoprotein
fr: mycoprotéine
hr: mikoprotein
it: micoproteina
sv: mycoprotein

en: Quorn mushroom product, quorn
de: Quorn-Pilzprodukt
fr: produit champignon quorn
hr: proizvod od gljiva quorn
it: quorn prodotto a base di fungo